Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1 Speech Language Pathologists and Audiologists
63-17-119. Enjoining violations.

The board, in addition to the powers and duties expressly granted by this chapter in the matter of suspension or revocation of a license and in the matter of the refusal to issue a certificate, is authorized and empowered to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction to enjoin any person who is engaging in any act or practice that constitutes an offense against this chapter. No injunction bond shall be required of the board.

Jurisdiction is conferred upon the circuit and chancery courts of the state to hear and determine such causes as chancery causes and to exercise full and complete jurisdiction in such injunctive proceedings.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 19; T.C.A., § 63-1719.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

63-17-120. Assistance of district attorneys general.

The board at all times has the power to call upon the district attorneys general for the state in the various districts to assist the board. It is hereby declared to be the duty of all district attorneys general throughout the state to assist the board, upon its request, in any suit for injunction or prosecution instituted by the board without charge or additional compensation to the district attorneys general.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 20; T.C.A., § 63-1720.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. L. Rev. 477.

63-17-121. Penalties.

A violation of this chapter is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 21; T.C.A., § 63-1721; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, recovery, § 63-1-134.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-17-122. [Reserved.]

63-17-124. Continuing education.

The board has the authority to promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, establishing mandatory continuing education. The board's rules shall require a minimum of ten (10) hours per year of continuing education.

Acts 1994, ch. 849, § 3.

63-17-125. Return of purchased hearing instruments.

Within thirty (30) days of the date of delivery, any purchaser of a hearing instrument from an audiologist licensed by the board to practice the assessing, selecting, fitting or dispensing or engaging in the sale of hearing instruments to the human ear is entitled to return the hearing instrument for any reason; provided, that such instrument is returned in satisfactory condition, and such purchaser shall pay only reasonable charges for the hearing instrument and related services. Such return privileges apply only to a first-time purchaser of a hearing instrument.

Charges to be imposed upon return of a hearing instrument as provided in subsection (a) shall be clearly stated in the bill of sale.

This section shall not be construed to supersede any duly promulgated regulation issued by the federal trade commission.

Acts 1994, ch. 849, § 12; 1995, ch. 481, § 30.

63-17-126. Standards of conduct.

When engaging in assessment, selection, fitting and sale of amplification systems or other assistive devices and technologies, a licensed audiologist shall perform such activities in compliance with the highest standards of professional conduct specifically prescribed for such activities by the United States food and drug administration, the Academy of Dispensing Audiologists, the American Academy of Audiology, the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association and the council for licensing hearing instrument specialists. Through promulgation of rules, publication and distribution of pamphlets, and/or other appropriate means, the board shall periodically notify and update all licensed audiologists concerning the applicable standards of conduct enforced pursuant to this section.

Acts 1994, ch. 849, § 13; 1995, ch. 481, § 40.

63-17-127. Inactive licenses to perform pro bono services.

The board shall establish by rule an inactive license category that allows audiologists and speech language pathologists to perform services without compensation only for those persons receiving services from organizations that have received a determination of exemption under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)). Such inactive license category shall not authorize any other practice of audiology or speech language pathology.

Acts 1997, ch. 345, § 5.

63-17-128. Registration as a speech language pathology assistant.

No person shall engage in practice as a speech language pathology assistant unless that person has first registered with the board.

A person who desires to register as a speech language pathology assistant shall provide proof that the person meets the minimum qualifications established by the board for speech language pathology assistants in its rules and shall pay the registration fees set by the board. The minimum qualifications previously established by the board in its rules shall remain in effect unless and until amended by the board.

Registration shall be valid for two (2) years. Each person registered as a speech language pathology assistant shall renew the person's registration biennially if that person desires to continue practicing as a speech language pathology assistant. The board may utilize the renewal system as described in § 63-1-107.

The amount of the fees required to be paid by speech language pathology assistants in connection with their registration shall be determined by the board.

Sections 63-17-117 — 63-17-120 shall apply to speech language pathology assistants in the same way they apply to speech language pathologists.

The board's rules shall require that each registered speech language pathology assistant obtain the minimum number of hours of continuing education each year that the board deems necessary to ensure the continued competence of the speech language pathology assistant.

The board shall adopt rules to implement this section in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2005, ch. 330, § 3.